Connecticut, session 2026, HB05545.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Subsection (d) of section 9-611 of the general statutes is
2 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
3 1, 2026):
4 (d) No individual shall make a contribution to any candidate or
5 committee, other than a contribution in kind, in excess of one hundred
6 dollars except by personal check or credit card of [that] such individual.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 9-611(d)
GAE Joint Favorable
HB5545 / File No. 524 1

HB5545 File No. 524
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill makes a technical change to campaign contribution limits,
resulting in no fiscal impact to the state or municipalities.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
HB5545 / File No. 524 2

HB5545 File No. 524
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5545
AN ACT MAKING A TECHNICAL CHANGE CONCERNING A
CAMPAIGN CONTRIBUTION LIMIT.